Indiana, session 2026, SB85.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-6-2-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) The attorney general may enforce the
provisions concerning wage garnishment of health care debt under
IC 24-4.5-5-105 and principal residence liens and IC 32-28-16.
(b) As used in this subsection, "medical creditor" and "medical
debt creditor" do not include a financial institution (as defined in
IC 28-1-1-3(1)). The attorney general may bring any enforcement
action under IC 24-5-0.5-4. The attorney general shall establish a
complaint process for an aggrieved individual of the public to file
a complaint against a medical creditor or medical debt collector
that violates IC 24-4.5-5-105 or IC 32-28-16. A complaint filed
under this section is considered a public record under IC 5-14-3.
However, the attorney general shall redact the name, address, and
any personal identifying information of the complainant.
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-52.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.188-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 52.5. (a) "Charity care", for purposes of
IC 16-21-6, IC 16-21-6.1, IC 16-21-9, and IC 16-40-6, means the
unreimbursed cost to a hospital of providing, funding, or otherwise
financially supporting health care services:
(1) to a person classified by the hospital as financially indigent or
medically indigent on an inpatient or outpatient basis; and
(2) to financially indigent patients through other nonprofit or
public outpatient clinics, hospitals, or health care organizations.
(b) As used in this section, "financially indigent" means an
uninsured or underinsured person who is accepted for care with no
obligation or a discounted obligation to pay for the services rendered
based on the hospital's financial criteria and procedure used to
determine if a patient is eligible for charity care. The criteria and
procedure must include income levels and means testing indexed to the
federal poverty guidelines. A hospital may determine that a person is
financially or medically indigent under the hospital's eligibility system
after health care services are provided.
(c) As used in this section, "medically indigent" means a person
whose medical or hospital bills after payment by third party payors
exceed a specified percentage of the patient's annual gross income as
determined in accordance with the hospital's eligibility system, and
who is financially unable to pay the remaining bill.
SECTION 3. IC 16-21-6.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 6.1. Hospitals' Billing Practices and Financial
Disclosures to Patients
Sec. 1. (a) This section applies to health care services provided
to a person by a hospital after June 30, 2026.
(b) With respect to any bill that:
(1) is for a person that has either:
(A) an income that is below four hundred percent (400%)
of the federal income poverty level (as defined in
IC 12-15-2-1); or
(B) a total bill that is greater than ten percent (10%) of the
person's gross monthly household income;
(2) includes charges for health care services provided to a
person by a hospital; and
(3) is submitted to that person for payment;
a hospital shall offer the person the opportunity to pay the listed
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


charges through a payment plan that satisfies the requirements set
forth in this section.
(c) A hospital's offer under subsection (b) must:
(1) be in writing and communicated in plain language;
(2) include instructions for how the person may enter into a
payment plan; and
(3) if the offer is included in the bill for the charges to which
the offer pertains, be printed in prominent type on the front
of the first page of the bill.
(d) A hospital may provide a person the offer required by
subsection (b):
(1) in a writing delivered to the person;
(2) by electronic mail; or
(3) through a mobile application or another Internet based
method, if available;
according to the person's expressed preference for
communications.
(e) If a person accepts a hospital's offer to enter into a payment
plan under this section, the hospital shall provide, in the manner
described in subsection (d), a written copy of the payment plan to
the person not later than five (5) business days after the payment
plan is executed by both parties. The plan must prominently
disclose:
(1) the rate of any interest that will be applied to unpaid
balances under the plan; and
(2) the date by which the account will be paid in full, assuming
that all scheduled payments will be made when due.
A person is not required to make a payment under the payment
plan until a written copy of the payment plan has been provided to
the person under this section in the manner described in subsection
(d).
(f) A hospital's payment plan under this section must satisfy the
following:
(1) The payment plan must allow payments to be made over
a period of at least twenty-four (24) months.
(2) The amount of any one (1) monthly payment may not
exceed ten percent (10%) of the person's gross monthly
household income.
(3) The first payment under the plan may not be due before
thirty (30) days have elapsed from the latest date of service
for the health care services to which the payment plan
pertains.
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


(4) Payments under the plan must be suspended without
penalty during the pendency of any appeal by the person for
the denial of insurance or other third party coverage for the
health care services to which the payment plan pertains if the
person provides the hospital with documentation of the
appeal. Payments under the plan may resume after the lesser
of either:
(A) the exhaustion of the appeals process; or
(B) one hundred twenty (120) days.
(5) The maximum interest rate assessed may not exceed three
percent (3%) per year.
Sec. 2. (a) A hospital shall develop a written notice about any
charity care program operated by the hospital and about the
procedures by which a person may apply for the charity care
program. The notice must be in English and, to the extent
practicable, in any other prevalent language used in the
communities served by the hospital. The notice must be:
(1) provided to a person at the time of intake or discharge of
the person; and
(2) conspicuously posted in the waiting area of the emergency
room, if any, and the admissions intake area of the hospital.
(b) The hospital must include on a patient's billing statement the
following information:
(1) A statement that financial assistance is available.
(2) The telephone number to call to obtain information
concerning financial assistance.
(3) An Internet link to a web page that includes information
and any documentation concerning obtaining financial
assistance.
Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a hospital that had gross patient revenue of at least twenty
million dollars ($20,000,000) during the hospital's
immediately preceding fiscal year, as reported to the state
department under IC 16-21-6-3; and
(2) emergency or medically necessary health care services
provided to a person by the hospital after June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "gross patient revenue" has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-21-6-1.
(c) If a person requests a determination of eligibility for a
payment plan or charity care program administered by the
hospital, the hospital shall provide written notice as provided in
subsection (d) not later than fourteen (14) days from the person's
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


request.
(d) The written notice under subsection (c) must include the
following:
(1) A statement notifying the person as to whether the person
is eligible for the hospital's payment plan or charity care
program.
(2) If the hospital has determined that the person is eligible
for the hospital's payment plan or charity care program, an
offer to enroll the person in the payment plan or charity care
program to the extent the hospital is able to do so under any:
(A) funding limits;
(B) enrollment limits; or
(C) other limits, caps, or restrictions;
applicable to the payment plan or charity care program at the
time of the person's enrollment.
(3) Instructions for how the person may enroll in the payment
plan or charity care program.
(e) A hospital may provide notice to a person under subsection
(d):
(1) in a writing delivered to the person;
(2) by electronic mail; or
(3) through a mobile application or another Internet based
method, if available;
according to the preference expressed by the person to whom
emergency or medically necessary health care services have been
provided.
Sec. 4. The state department may take action to enforce this
chapter under IC 16-21-3.
SECTION 4. IC 16-21-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.6-2012,
SECTION 115, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each nonprofit hospital shall
prepare an annual report of the community benefits plan. The report
must include, in addition to the community benefits plan itself, the
following background information:
(1) The hospital's mission statement.
(2) A disclosure of the health care needs of the community that
were considered in developing the hospital's community benefits
plan.
(3) A disclosure of the amount and types of community benefits
actually provided, including charity care. Charity care must be
reported as a separate item from other community benefits.
(b) Each nonprofit hospital shall annually file a report of the
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


community benefits plan with the state department. For a hospital's
fiscal year that ends before July 1, 2011, the report must be filed not
later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the close of the
hospital's fiscal year. For a hospital's fiscal year that ends after June 30,
2011, the report must be filed at the same time the nonprofit hospital
files its annual return described under Section 6033 of the Internal
Revenue Code that is timely filed under Section 6072(e) of the Internal
Revenue Code, including any applicable extension authorized under
Section 6081 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) Each nonprofit hospital shall prepare a statement that notifies the
public that the annual report of the community benefits plan is:
(1) public information;
(2) filed with the state department; and
(3) available to the public on request from the state department.
This statement shall be posted in prominent places throughout the
hospital, including the emergency room waiting area and the
admissions office waiting area. The statement shall also be printed in
the hospital patient guide or other material that provides the patient
with information about the admissions criteria of the hospital.
(d) Each nonprofit hospital shall develop, provide, and post a
written notice about any charity care program operated by the hospital
and how to apply for charity care. The notice must be in appropriate
languages if possible. The notice must also be conspicuously posted in
the following areas:
(1) The general waiting area.
(2) The waiting area for emergency services.
(3) The business office.
(4) Any other area that the hospital considers an appropriate area
in which to provide notice of a charity care program. in
accordance with IC 16-21-6.1-2.
SECTION 5. IC 24-4.5-5-105, AS AMENDED BY P.L.78-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 105. (1) For the purposes of IC 24-4.5-5-101
through IC 24-4.5-5-108:
(a) "disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual, including wages, commissions, income, rents, or
profits remaining after the deduction from those earnings of
amounts required by law to be withheld;
(b) "garnishment" means any legal or equitable proceedings
through which the earnings of an individual are required to be
withheld by a garnishee, by the individual debtor, or by any other
person for the payment of a judgment; and
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


(c) "health care debt" means an obligation or an alleged
obligation of a consumer to pay an amount related to the
receipt of medically necessary (as defined in IC 27-1-37.5-5.4)
health care services, products, or devices provided to a person
by a health care provider. The term does not include
Medicaid expenses subject to recovery under IC 12-15, debt
purchased by, payable to, or owed to a financial institution (as
defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)), or debt charged to a credit card
unless the credit card is issued under:
(i) an open-end plan; or
(ii) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person;
(d) as used in this section, "health care provider" means:
(i) a hospital or facility listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(ii) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-13.4).
The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of
a person described in item (i) or (ii); and
(c) (e) "support withholding" means that part of the earnings that
are withheld from an individual for child support in accordance
with the laws of this state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (8) and subsection (9), the
maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an individual for
any workweek which is subjected to garnishment to enforce the
payment of one (1) or more judgments against the individual may not
exceed the lesser of the following amounts:
(a) An amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the
individual's disposable earnings for that week or, upon a showing
of good cause by the individual why the amount should be
reduced, an amount equal to:
(i) less than twenty-five percent (25%); and
(ii) at least ten percent (10%);
of the individual's disposable earnings for that week.
(b) The amount by which the individual's disposable earnings for
that week exceed thirty (30) times the federal minimum hourly
wage prescribed by 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1) in effect at the time the
earnings are payable.
In the case of earnings for a pay period other than a week, the earnings
shall be computed upon a multiple of the federal minimum hourly wage
equivalent to thirty (30) times the federal minimum hourly wage as
prescribed in this section.
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


(3) The maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an
individual for any workweek which is subject to garnishment or
support withholding to enforce any order for the support of any person
shall not exceed:
(a) where such individual is supporting the individual's spouse or
dependent child (other than a spouse or child with respect to
whose support such order is used), fifty percent (50%) of such
individual's disposable earnings for that week; and
(b) where such individual is not supporting such a spouse or
dependent child described in subdivision (a), sixty percent (60%)
of such individual's disposable earnings for that week;
except that, with respect to the disposable earnings of any individual
for any workweek, the fifty percent (50%) specified in subdivision (a)
shall be deemed to be fifty-five percent (55%) and the sixty percent
(60%) specified in subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be sixty-five
percent (65%), if and to the extent that such earnings are subject to
garnishment or support withholding to enforce a support order with
respect to a period which is prior to the twelve (12) week period which
ends with the beginning of such workweek.
(4) No court may make, execute, or enforce an order or process in
violation of this section.
(5) An employer who is required to make deductions from an
individual's disposable earnings pursuant to a garnishment order or
series of orders arising out of the same judgment debt (excluding a
judgment for payment of child support) may collect, as a fee to
compensate the employer for making these deductions, an amount
equal to the greater of twelve dollars ($12) or three percent (3%) of the
total amount required to be deducted by the garnishment order or series
of orders arising out of the same judgment debt. If the employer
chooses to impose a fee, the fee shall be allocated as follows:
(a) One-half (1/2) of the fee shall be borne by the debtor, and that
amount may be deducted by the employer directly from the
employee's disposable earnings.
(b) One-half (1/2) of the fee shall be borne by the creditor, and
that amount may be retained by the employer from the amount
otherwise due the creditor.
The deductions made under this subsection for a collection fee do not
increase the amount of the judgment debt for which the fee is collected
for the purpose of calculating or collecting judgment interest. This fee
may be collected by an employer only once for each garnishment order
or series of orders arising out of the same judgment debt. The employer
may collect the entire fee from one (1) or more of the initial deductions
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


from the employee's disposable earnings. Alternatively, the employer
may collect the fee ratably over the number of pay periods during
which deductions from the employee's disposable earnings are
required.
(6) The deduction of the garnishment collection fee under
subsection (5)(a) or subsection (7) is not an assignment of wages under
IC 22-2-6.
(7) An employer who is required to make a deduction from an
individual's disposable earnings in accordance with a judgment for
payment of child support may collect a fee of two dollars ($2) each
time the employer is required to make the deduction. The fee may be
deducted by the employer from the individual's disposable earnings
each time the employer makes the deduction for support. If the
employer elects to deduct such a fee, the amount to be deducted for the
payment of support must be reduced accordingly if necessary to avoid
exceeding the maximum amount permitted to be deducted under
subsection (3).
(8) A support withholding order takes priority over a garnishment
order irrespective of their dates of entry or activation. If a person is
subject to a support withholding order and a garnishment order, the
garnishment order shall be honored only to the extent that disposable
earnings withheld under the support withholding order do not exceed
the maximum amount subject to garnishment as computed under
subsection (2).
(9) For health care debt, the maximum part of the aggregate
disposable earnings of an individual for any workweek which is
subjected to garnishment to enforce the payment of one (1) or more
judgments against the individual concerning health care debt may
not exceed the following amounts:
(a) For an individual who earns two hundred percent (200%)
or less of the federal income poverty level, zero dollars ($0).
(b) For an individual who earns above two hundred percent
(200%) of the federal income poverty level, not more than ten
percent (10%) of the individual's disposable earnings for that
week that are above the two hundred percent (200%) of the
federal income poverty level.
SECTION 6. IC 32-28-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 16. Prohibition Against Lien on Principal Residence of
a Consumer for Health Care Debt
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "consumer" means an
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


individual whose principal residence is in Indiana.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) A protected consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(2) A representative acting on behalf of a protected consumer
(as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "health care debt" means an
obligation or an alleged obligation of a consumer to pay an amount
related to the receipt of medically necessary (as defined in
IC 27-1-37.5-5.4) health care services, products, or devices
provided to a person by a health care provider.
(b) The term does not include Medicaid expenses subject to
recovery under IC 12-15 or the following:
(1) Debt purchased by, payable to, or owed to a financial
institution (as defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)).
(2) Debt charged to a credit card unless the credit card is
issued under:
(A) an open-end plan; or
(B) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "health care provider" means:
(1) a hospital or facility listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(2) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-13.4).
The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of a
person described in subdivision (1) or (2).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "principal residence", with
respect to a consumer, means real or personal property that:
(1) is located in Indiana;
(2) the consumer:
(A) owns; or
(B) is buying under contract;
whether solely or jointly with another person; and
(3) constitutes the principal place of residence of:
(A) the consumer; or
(B) a dependent of the consumer.
Sec. 5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law:
(1) any amount of health care debt owed or alleged to be owed
by a consumer; or
(2) in an action against a consumer in which a judgment has
been entered, any amount of the judgment that represents
health care debt determined to be owed by the consumer;
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


does not constitute a lien against the consumer's principal
residence.
(b) A person having any ownership or other interest in an
amount described in subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) may not assert,
claim, enter, or enforce a lien against the consumer's principal
residence.
SECTION 7. IC 34-55-1-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The execution must
intelligibly refer to the judgment, stating:
(1) the court where and the time when rendered;
(2) the names of the parties;
(3) the amount, if the judgment is for money; and
(4) the amount actually due on the judgment; and
(5) whether the debt is a health care debt (as defined in
IC 24-4.5-5-105(1)(c)).
SECTION 8. IC 34-55-9-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Consumer" means an individual whose principal
residence is in Indiana. The term includes the following:
(A) A protected consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(B) A representative acting on behalf of a protected
consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(2) "Health care debt" means an obligation or an alleged
obligation of a consumer to pay an amount related to the
receipt of medically necessary (as defined in IC 27-1-37.5-5.4)
health care services, products, or devices provided to a person
by a health care provider. The term does not include
Medicaid expenses subject to recovery under IC 12-15 or the
following:
(A) Debt purchased by, payable to, or owed to a financial
institution (as defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)).
(B) Debt charged to a credit card unless the credit card is
issued under:
(i) an open-end plan; or
(ii) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.
(3) "Health care provider" means:
(A) a hospital or facility listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(B) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


IC 16-18-2-13.4).
The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of
a person described in clause (A) or (B).
(4) "Principal residence", with respect to a consumer, means
real or personal property that:
(A) is located in Indiana;
(B) the consumer:
(i) owns; or
(ii) is buying under contract;
whether solely or jointly with another person; and
(C) constitutes the principal place of residence of:
(i) the consumer; or
(ii) a dependent of the consumer.
SECTION 9. IC 34-55-9-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), the following real estate is liable to all
judgments and attachments and to be sold on execution against the
debtor owing owning the real estate or for whose use the real estate is
held:
(1) All lands of the judgment debtor, whether in possession,
remainder, or reversion.
(2) All rights of redeeming mortgaged lands and all lands held by
virtue of any land office certificate.
(3) Lands or any estate or interest in land held by anyone in trust
for or to the use of another.
(4) All chattels real of the judgment debtor.
(b) In any action filed, in a court of competent jurisdiction in
Indiana, for the recovery of health care debt owed or alleged to be
owed by a consumer, the principal residence of the consumer is not
liable to judgment or attachment or to be sold on execution against
the consumer.
SECTION 10. IC 34-55-9-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), all final judgments for the recovery of
money or costs in the circuit court and other courts of record of general
original jurisdiction in Indiana, whether state or federal, constitute a
lien upon real estate and chattels real liable to execution in the county
where the judgment has been duly entered and indexed in the judgment
docket as provided by law:
(1) after the time the judgment was entered and indexed; and
(2) until the expiration of ten (10) years after the rendition of the
judgment;
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


exclusive of any time during which the party was restrained from
proceeding on the lien by an appeal, an injunction, the death of the
defendant, or the agreement of the parties entered of record.
(b) A final judgment for the recovery of money or costs in any
action filed, in a court of competent jurisdiction in Indiana, for the
recovery of health care debt owed or alleged to be owed by a
consumer does not constitute a lien upon the principal residence of
the consumer.
SECTION 11. An emergency is declared for this act.
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Health and Provider
Services, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 85, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 1, line 4, after "garnishment" insert "of health care debt".
Page 1, line 6, after "(b)" insert "As used in this subsection,
"medical creditor" and "medical debt creditor" do not include a
financial institution (as defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)).".
Page 4, line 3, delete "patient" and insert "person".
Page 4, line 4, delete "sixty (60)" and insert "the lesser of either:
(A) the exhaustion of the appeals process; or
(B) one hundred twenty (120) days.".
Page 4, delete lines 5 through 7.
Page 7, line 3, after "include" insert "Medicaid expenses subject to
recovery under IC 12-15,".
Page 7, line 3, after "debt" insert "purchased by, payable to, or
owed to a financial institution (as defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)), or
debt".
Page 10, line 6, after "include" insert "Medicaid expenses subject
to recovery under IC 12-15 or".
Page 10, line 6, delete "debt charged to a credit card" and insert "the
following:
(1) Debt purchased by, payable to, or owed to a financial
institution (as defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)).
(2) Debt charged to a credit card unless the credit card is
issued under:
(A) an open-end plan; or
(B) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.".
Page 10, delete lines 7 through 11.
Page 10, between lines 39 and 40, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 7. IC 34-55-1-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The execution must
intelligibly refer to the judgment, stating:
(1) the court where and the time when rendered;
(2) the names of the parties;
(3) the amount, if the judgment is for money; and
(4) the amount actually due on the judgment; and
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104


(5) whether the debt is a health care debt (as defined in
IC 24-4.5-5-105(1)(c)).".
Page 11, line 11, after "include" insert "Medicaid expenses subject
to recovery under IC 12-15 or".
Page 11, line 11, delete "debt" and insert "the following:
(A) Debt purchased by, payable to, or owed to a financial
institution (as defined in IC 28-1-1-3(1)).
(B) Debt charged to a credit card unless the credit card is
issued under:
(i) an open-end plan; or
(ii) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.".
Page 11, delete lines 12 through 16.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 85 as introduced.)
CHARBONNEAU, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0.
SB 85—LS 6422/DI 104